Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-211 Penalties. (a) Any person,
other than an insured, who represents or aids an unauthorized insurer in
violation of this part may be subject to a fine not in excess of $1,000.

(b) Any unauthorized insurer who transacts any
unauthorized act of an insurance business as set forth in this part may be
fined not more than $10,000. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 207, §6; am
L 2006, c 154, §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next